test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-potyr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# Based on LS 2014

  Noun - потыр: # Noun 122 'word' - full paradigm, FIXME!
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom: потыр
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: потрум
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: потырын #
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: потре
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [потруме̄н, потрумен]
# (2007: 30) short
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: потры̄н #
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: потре̄н #
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: потрув
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: потры̄н #
     потыр+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: потраныл
     
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc: потрыт
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: потрумт #
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: потрынт #
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: потре̄т 
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: потырме̄нт #
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: потры̄нт #
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: потре̄нт #
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: потрувт 
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: потры̄нт #
     потыр+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: потранылт #

#    (2007: 43)    explicitely not this +Dat??
     потыр+N+Sg+Lat: потрын 
     потыр+N+Sg+Abl: потырныл #
     потыр+N+Sg+Ins: потрыл #
     потыр+N+Sg+Tra: потрыг  
     
     потыр+N+Du+Nom: потырыг #
     потыр+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: потрагум #
     потыр+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: потрагын #
     потыр+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: потраге #
     потыр+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: потрагме̄н #
     потыр+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: потрагы̄н #
     потыр+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: потраге̄н #
     потыр+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: потрагув #
     потыр+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: потрагы̄н #
     потыр+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: потраганыл #

     потыр+N+Pl+Nom: потрыт
     потыр+N+Pl+Abl: потрытныл
     потыр+N+Pl+Ins: [потрытыл, потрытл]
     потыр+N+Pl+Loc: [потрытыт, потрытт]
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: потранум 
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: потранын #
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: потранэ 
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: потранме̄н #
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: потраны̄н #
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: потранэ̄н 
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: потранув #
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: потраны̄н #
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: потрананыл #

# потраме̄гыт
# потрамасум
# потраныл
# потранылт
# потрамасме̄н
# потармасӯв
# потраме̄в
# потраме̄гыт
# потранэтув
# потранэ̄тыл
# потрамасыт
# потрамас
# потрамаӈкв
# потыртас
# потыртасыт
